Hawaii statutes.
§346-153 Records of deficiencies and
complaints; release to public. For every child care facility, the department
shall maintain records for the current and previous two years of: results of its
inspections; notifications to providers of deficiencies; corrective action taken;
complaints of violations of rules adopted under this part; results of its investigations;
resolution of complaints; and suspensions, revocations, reinstatements, restorations,
and reissuances of licenses, temporary permits, and registrations issued under this
part. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the records described in
this section shall be available for inspection in the manner set forth in
chapter 92F and may be posted by the department on a public website; provided
that with respect to records of family child care homes and group child care
homes, sensitive personal information, including home addresses, or information
provided to the department with the understanding that it would not be publicly
divulged shall be deleted or obliterated prior to making the records available to
the public. Nothing in this section shall authorize the department to release the
names of or any other identifying information on complainants. The department may
withhold information on a complaint for which an investigation is being conducted
for not more than ten working days following the date of filing of the complaint;
provided that if an investigation relates to an alleged criminal offense, no information
shall be released until the investigation has been completed and the director has
determined that no legal proceeding will be jeopardized by its release. [L
1985, c 208, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 88, §3]

Note

Section 92-51 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next